Colorado, session 2026A, HB1073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-328 as
follows:
2-2-328. Limitations on introduction of bills by members of
the general assembly.
(1) COMMENCING WITH THE FIRST REGULAR SESSION OF THE
SEVENTY-SIXTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND DURING EACH REGULAR
SESSION THEREAFTER, A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY NOT
INTRODUCE MORE THAN THREE BILLS, EXCLUDING BILLS FOR
APPROPRIATIONS AND BILLS FROM AMONG THOSE RECOMMENDED BY
COMMITTEES THAT MEET DURING THE INTERIM AND ARE CREATED BY
STATUTE, BY EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE RESOLUTION, OR PURSUANT TO
SECTION 2-3-303.3. IN ADDITION TO ANY BILLS RECOMMENDED FOR
APPROVAL AS INTERIM COMMITTEE BILLS, THE LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEES
CREATED IN ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 2 AND THE COMMITTEES OF
REFERENCE PERFORMING THE DUTIES REQUIRED IN SECTIONS 24-1-136
AND 24-34-104 MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR STATUTORY
AUTHORITY, RECOMMEND ANY ADDITIONAL BILLS FOR INTRODUCTION
DURING A LEGISLATIVE SESSION. SUCH ADDITIONAL BILLS SHALL BE
EXEMPT FROM THE THREE-BILL LIMITATION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(1).
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF BILLS THAT
-2- HB26-1073

A LEGISLATOR MAY INTRODUCE DURING A REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION,
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE,
AND THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE, OR THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, AND THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES MAY ALLOW A LEGISLATOR IN THEIR RESPECTIVE
CHAMBER TO INTRODUCE ONE OR MORE ADDITIONAL BILLS AT ANY TIME
DURING THE REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION ONLY IF AT LEAST TWO OF
SUCH SENATORS OR REPRESENTATIVES, AS APPLICABLE, DETERMINE THAT:
(a) THE BILL IS REQUESTED BY A LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE
CREATED IN ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 2 IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS
STATUTORY AUTHORITY OR REQUESTED BY THE COMMITTEES OF
REFERENCE PERFORMING THE DUTIES REQUIRED IN SECTIONS 24-1-136
AND 24-34-104, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR STATUTORY AUTHORITY;
(b) THE REQUESTED BILL PERTAINS TO AN EMERGENCY MATTER
THAT NEEDS TO BE ADDRESSED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY BEFORE THE
NEXT REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION; OR
(c) THE REQUESTED BILL PERTAINS TO THE CORRECTION OF A
TECHNICAL OR CLERICAL ERROR IN A BILL ALREADY PASSED DURING THE
THEN CURRENT REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
-3- HB26-1073

unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1073